New Mexico, session 2026, SB123.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--One million two hundred thousand dollars ($1,200,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the public education department for expenditure in fiscal years 2027 through 2029 for grants to public schools that have met the requirements of Subsection A of Section 22-33-6 NMSA 1978; provided that no more than four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) may be expended in a single fiscal year, and in fiscal year 2027 grants shall only be made to public schools that are not located in an area designated as an urban area by the United States census bureau. Money granted to a public school pursuant to this appropriation may only be used to purchase, install, test or maintain automated external defibrillators. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2029 shall revert to the general fund. - 2 -